Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1186.01.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Reimbursements to localities for upgrades to treatment works.

As used in this section, “Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program” or “ENRC Program” means the same as that term is defined in § 62.1-44.19:13.

The General Assembly shall fund grants to finance the reasonable costs of design and installation of nutrient removal technology at the publicly owned treatment works designated as significant dischargers contained in subsection F or as eligible nonsignificant dischargers as defined in §

10.1-2117

. When grant disbursements pursuant to this section reach a sum sufficient to fund the completion of the ENRC Program at all publicly owned treatment works, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations shall review (i) the future funding needs to meet the purposes of the Water Quality Improvement Act, (ii) the most recent annual needs estimate required by §

10.1-2134.1

, and (iii) the appropriate funding mechanism for such needs.

The disbursement of grants for the design and installation of nutrient removal technology at those publicly owned treatment works included in subsection F and eligible nonsignificant dischargers shall be made monthly based on a requisition submitted by the grant recipient in the form requested by the Department. Each requisition shall include written certification that the applicable local share of the cost of nutrient removal technology for that portion of the project covered by such requisition has been incurred or expended. Except as may otherwise be approved by the Department, disbursements shall not exceed 95 percent of the total grant amount until satisfactory completion of the project. The distribution of the grants shall be effected by one of the following methods:

In payments to be paid by the State Treasurer out of funds appropriated to the Water Quality Improvement Fund pursuant to §

10.1-2131

;

Over a specified time through a contractual agreement entered into by the Treasury Board and approved by the Governor, on behalf of the Commonwealth, and the locality or public service authority undertaking the design and installation of nutrient removal technology, such payments to be paid by the State Treasurer out of funds appropriated to the Treasury Board; or

In payments to be paid by the State Treasurer upon request of the Director out of proceeds from bonds issued by the Virginia Public Building Authority, in consultation with the Department, pursuant to §§ 2.2-2261, 2.2-2263, and 2.2-2264, including the Commonwealth’s share of the interest costs expended by the locality or regional authority for financing such project during the period from 50 percent completion of construction to final completion of construction.

The General Assembly has the sole authority to determine whether disbursement shall be made pursuant to subdivision C 1, 2, or 3, or a combination thereof, provided that a disbursement shall be made pursuant to subdivision C 3 only upon a certification by the Department that project grant reimbursements for the fiscal year will exceed the available funds in the Water Quality Improvement Fund.

Exclusive of any deposits made pursuant to §

10.1-2128

, the grants awarded pursuant to this section shall include such appropriations as provided from time to time in the appropriation act or any amendments thereto.

The disbursement of grants to finance the costs of design and installation of nutrient removal technology, including eligible design and installation costs for implementation of the ENRC Program, at the following listed publicly owned treatment works and other eligible nonsignificant dischargers shall be provided pursuant to the distribution methodology included in §

10.1-2131

. The notation “WIP3-N” or “WIP3-P” indicates that a facility is subject to additional requirements for total nitrogen or total phosphorus, respectively, under the ENRC Program. In no case shall any publicly owned treatment works receive a grant of less than 35 percent of the costs of the design and installation of nutrient removal technology.

Click to view

To the extent that any publicly owned treatment works receives less than the grant specified pursuant to §

10.1-2131

, any year-end revenue surplus or unappropriated balances deposited in the Water Quality Improvement Fund, as required by §

10.1-2128

, shall be prioritized in order to augment the funding of those projects for which grants have been prorated. Any additional reimbursements to these prorated projects shall not exceed the total reimbursement amount due pursuant to the formula established in subsection E of §

10.1-2131

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of §

10.1-2131

, the Director shall not be required to enter into a grant agreement with a facility designated as a significant discharger or eligible nonsignificant discharger if the Director determines that the use of nutrient credits in accordance with the Chesapeake Bay Watershed Nutrient Credit Exchange Program (§ 62.1-44.19:12 et seq.) would be significantly more cost-effective than the installation of nutrient controls for the facility in question.

FACILITY NAME OWNER Shenandoah - Potomac River Basin ACSA-Fishersville STP Augusta County Service Authority Luray STP Town of Luray ACSA-Middle River Regional STP Augusta County Service Authority HRRSA-North River WWTF WIP3-P Harrisonburg-Rockingham Regional Sewer Authority ACSA-Stuarts Draft STP Augusta County Service Authority Waynesboro STP City of Waynesboro ACSA-Weyers Cave STP Augusta County Service Authority Berryville STP Town of Berryville Front Royal STP Town of Front Royal Mount Jackson STP Town of Mount Jackson New Market STP Town of New Market Shenandoah Co.-North Fork Regional WWTP Shenandoah County Stoney Creek Sanitary District STP Stoney Creek Sanitary District Strasburg STP Town of Strasburg Woodstock STP Town of Woodstock FWSA-Opequon Water Reclamation Facility Frederick-Winchester Service Authority FWSA-Parkins Mill WWTF Frederick-Winchester Service Authority Purcellville-Basham Simms WWTF Town of Purcellville LCSA-Broad Run WRF Loudoun County Service Authority Leesburg WPCF Town of Leesburg Round Hill WWTP Town of Round Hill PWCSA-H.L. Mooney WWTF Prince William County Service Authority Upper Occoquan Sewage Authority WWTP Upper Occoquan Sewage Authority FCW&SA-Vint Hill WWTF Fauquier County Water and Sewer Authority Alexandria Sanitation Authority WWTP Alexandria Sanitation Authority Arlington Co. WPCF Arlington County Fairfax Co. Noman-Cole Fairfax County Pollution Control Facility Stafford Co.-Aquia WWTP Stafford County Colonial Beach STP Town of Colonial Beach Dahlgren Sanitary District WWTP King George County Service Authority Fairview Beach STP King George County Service Authority Purkins Corner WWTP King George County Service Authority District of Columbia - Blue Plains STP (Virginia portion) Loudoun County Service Authority and Fairfax County contract for capacity Rappahannock River Basin Culpeper WWTP Town of Culpeper Marshall WWTP Town of Marshall Mountain Run WWTP Culpeper County Orange STP Town of Orange Rapidan STP Rapidan Service Authority FCW&SA-Remmington WWTP Fauquier County Water and Sewer Authority Warrenton STP Town of Warrenton Wilderness Shores WWTP Rapidan Service Authority Spotsylvania Co.-FMC WWTF Spotsylvania County Fredericksburg WWTF WIP3-N, WIP3-P City of Fredericksburg Stafford Co.-Little Falls Run WWTF Stafford County Spotsylvania Co.-Massaponax WWTF WIP3-N, WIP3-P Spotsylvania County Montross-Westmoreland WWTP Westmoreland County Oakland Park STP King George County Service Authority Tappahannock WWTP Town of Tappahannock Urbanna WWTP Hampton Roads Sanitation District Warsaw STP Town of Warsaw Reedville Sanitary District WWTP Reedville Sanitary District 60 Kilmarnock WWTP Town of Kilmarnock York River Basin Caroline Co. Regional STP Caroline County Gordonsville STP Rapidan Service Authority Ashland WWTP Hanover County Doswell WWTP Hanover County HRSD-York River STP WIP3-N Hampton Roads Sanitation District Parham Landing WWTP New Kent County Totopotomoy WWTP Hanover County HRSD-West Point STP Hampton Roads Sanitation District HRSD-Mathews Courthouse STP Hampton Roads Sanitation District Spotsylvania Co.-Thornburg STP WIP3-N, WIP3-P Spotsylvania County James River Basin Buena Vista STP City of Buena Vista Covington STP City of Covington Lexington-Rockbridge Regional WQCF Maury Service Authority Alleghany Co.-Low Moor STP Alleghany County Alleghany Co.-Lower Jackson River WWTP Alleghany County Amherst-Rutledge Creek WWTP Town of Amherst Lynchburg STP City of Lynchburg RWSA-Moores Creek Regional STP Rivanna Water and Sewer Authority Crewe WWTP Town of Crewe Farmville WWTP Town of Farmville Chesterfield Co.-Falling Creek WWTP Chesterfield County Henrico Co. WWTP Henrico County Hopewell Regional WWTF City of Hopewell Chesterfield Co.-Proctors Creek WWTP Chesterfield County Richmond WWTP City of Richmond South Central Wastewater Authority WWTF WIP3-N, WIP3-P South Central Wastewater Authority HRSD-Boat Harbor STP WIP3-N, WIP3-P Hampton Roads Sanitation District HRSD-Williamsburg STP WIP3-N, WIP3-P Hampton Roads Sanitation District HRSD-Nansemond STP WIP3-N, WIP3-P Hampton Roads Sanitation District HRSD-Army Base STP WIP3-N, WIP3-P Hampton Roads Sanitation District HRSD-Virginia Initiative Plant STP WIP3-N, WIP3-P Hampton Roads Sanitation District HRSD-Chesapeake/Elizabeth STP WIP3-N, WIP3-P Hampton Roads Sanitation District Eastern Shore Basin Cape Charles WWTP Town of Cape Charles Onancock WWTP Town of Onancock Tangier Island WWTP Town of Tangier

History.

2007, cc. 851, 900; 2008, c. 572; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363, 364; 2022, cc. 127, 128.

§ 10.1-1186.1:1.
Hazardous Waste Site Inventory.

The Department shall compile and maintain a Hazardous Waste Site Inventory (the Inventory) comprising a current listing of sites permitted by or in corrective action under the Department at which the disposal of hazardous waste, as defined in §

10.1-1400

and not otherwise excluded from regulation as hazardous waste, has occurred. The Inventory shall contain specific information about each listed site, including (i) the location of the site, (ii) the nature and known characteristics of the wastes disposed of at the site, and (iii) the status of any remedial or corrective action undertaken or planned for the site. The Department shall only disclose in the Inventory information that is not otherwise subject to an exemption from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§ 2.2-3700 et seq.).

The Department shall publish the Inventory by July 1, 2021, update it at least annually thereafter, and post it on the Department’s website.

History.

2020, c. 491.

§ 10.1-1186.1.
Department to publish toxics inventory.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall publish in March of each year the information reported by industries pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 11023 in its document known as the “Virginia Toxic Release Inventory.” The report shall be (i) organized by chemical, facility and facility location, and standard industrial classification code, and (ii) distributed to newspapers of general circulation and television and radio stations. The report shall include the information collected for the most recent calendar year for which data is available prior to the March publication date.

History.

1997, c. 155.

§ 10.1-1186.2.
Supplemental environmental projects.

As used in this section, “supplemental environmental project” means an environmentally beneficial project undertaken as partial settlement of a civil enforcement action and not otherwise required by law.

The State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, or the Director acting on behalf of one of these boards or under his own authority in issuing any administrative order, or any court of competent jurisdiction as provided for under this Code, may, in its or his discretion and with the consent of the person subject to the order, provide for such person to undertake one or more supplemental environmental projects. The project shall have a reasonable geographic nexus to the violation or, if no such project is available, shall advance at least one of the declared objectives of the environmental law or regulation that is the basis of the enforcement action. Performance of such projects shall be enforceable in the same manner as any other provision of the order.

The following categories of projects may qualify as supplemental environmental projects, provided the project otherwise meets the requirements of this section: public health, pollution prevention, pollution reduction, environmental restoration and protection, environmental compliance promotion, and emergency planning and preparedness. In determining the appropriateness and value of a supplemental environmental project, the following factors shall be considered by the enforcement authority: net project costs, benefits to the public or the environment, innovation, impact on minority or low income populations, multimedia impact, and pollution prevention. The costs of those portions of a supplemental environmental project that are funded by state or federal low-interest loans, contracts or grants shall be deducted from the net project cost in evaluating the project. In each case in which a supplemental environmental project is included as part of a settlement, an explanation of the project with any appropriate supporting documentation shall be included as part of the case file.

Nothing in this section shall require the disclosure of documents exempt from disclosure pursuant to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§ 2.2-3700 et seq.).

Any decision whether or not to agree to a supplemental environmental project is within the sole discretion of the applicable board, official or court and shall not be subject to appeal.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or applied in a manner inconsistent with applicable federal law or any applicable requirement for the Commonwealth to obtain or maintain federal delegation or approval of any regulatory program.

History.

1997, cc. 623, 628.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Code Commission, the number in the 1997 act having been

10.1-1186.1

.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

§ 10.1-1186.2:1.
Impact of electric generating facilities.

The Department and the State Air Pollution Control Board have the authority to consider the cumulative impact of new and proposed electric generating facilities within the Commonwealth on attainment of the national ambient air quality standards.

The Department shall enter into a memorandum of agreement with the State Corporation Commission regarding the coordination of reviews of the environmental impacts of proposed electric generating facilities that must obtain certificates from the State Corporation Commission. When considering the environmental impact of any renewable energy (defined in § 56-576) electrical utility facility, the Department shall consult with interested agencies of the Commonwealth that have expertise in natural resource management. The Department shall submit recommendations to the State Corporation Commission that take into account the information and comments submitted by such natural resource agencies concerning the potential environmental impacts of the proposed electric generating facility. The Department’s recommendations shall include: (i) specific mitigation measures considered necessary to minimize adverse environmental impacts; (ii) any additional site-specific studies considered to be necessary; and (iii) the scope and duration of any such studies. Nothing in this subsection shall alter or affect the Rules of Practice and Procedure of the State Corporation Commission.

Prior to the close of the Commission’s record on an application for certification of an electric generating facility pursuant to § 56-580, the Department shall provide to the State Corporation Commission a list of all environmental permits and approvals that are required for the proposed electric generating facility and shall specify any environmental issues, identified during the review process, that are not governed by those permits or approvals or are not within the authority of, and not considered by, the Department or other participating governmental entity in issuing such permits or approvals. The Department may recommend to the Commission that the Commission’s record remain open pending completion of any required environmental review, approval or permit proceeding. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Department, as requested by the Director, in preparing the information required by this subsection.

History.

2002, c. 483; 2008, c. 528.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 528 added the second through the last sentences in subsection B.

Law Review.

For article surveying changes in environmental law in Virginia from June 2001 to June 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 117 (2002).

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

§ 10.1-1186.3.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Additional powers of Boards; mediation; alternative dispute resolution.

The State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board and the Virginia Waste Management Board, in their discretion, may employ mediation as defined in §

8.01-581.21

, or a dispute resolution proceeding as defined in §

8.01-576.4

, in appropriate cases to resolve underlying issues, reach a consensus or compromise on contested issues. An “appropriate case” means any process related to the development of a regulation or the issuance of a permit in which it is apparent that there are significant issues of disagreement among interested persons and for which the Board finds that the use of a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding is in the public interest. The Boards shall consider not using a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding if:

A definitive or authoritative resolution of the matter is required for precedential value, and such a proceeding is not likely to be accepted generally as an authoritative precedent;

The matter involves or may bear upon significant questions of state policy that require additional procedures before a final resolution may be made, and such a proceeding would not likely serve to develop a recommended policy for the Board;

Maintaining established policies is of special importance, so that variations among individual decisions are not increased and such a proceeding would not likely reach consistent results among individual decisions;

The matter significantly affects persons or organizations who are not parties to the proceeding;

A full public record of the proceeding is important, and a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding cannot provide such a record; and

The Board must maintain continuing jurisdiction over the matter with the authority to alter the disposition of the matter in light of changed circumstances, and a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding would interfere with the Board’s fulfilling that requirement.Mediation and alternative dispute resolution as authorized by this section are voluntary procedures which supplement rather than limit other dispute resolution techniques available to the Boards. Mediation or a dispute resolution proceeding may be employed in the issuance of a permit only with the consent and participation of the permit applicant and shall be terminated at the request of the permit applicant.

The decision to employ mediation or a dispute resolution proceeding is in a Board’s sole discretion and is not subject to judicial review.

The outcome of any mediation or dispute resolution proceeding shall not be binding upon a Board, but may be considered by a Board in issuing a permit or promulgating a regulation.

Each Board shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Process Act, for the implementation of this section. Such rules and regulations shall include: (i) standards and procedures for the conduct of mediation and dispute resolution, including an opportunity for interested persons identified by the Board to participate in the proceeding; (ii) the appointment and function of a neutral, as defined in §

8.01-576.4

, to encourage and assist parties to voluntarily compromise or settle contested issues; and (iii) procedures to protect the confidentiality of papers, work product or other materials.

The provisions of §

8.01-576.10

concerning the confidentiality of a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding shall govern all such proceedings held pursuant to this section except where a Board uses or relies on information obtained in the course of such proceeding in issuing a permit or promulgating a regulation.Nothing in this section shall create or alter any right, action or cause of action, or be interpreted or applied in a manner inconsistent with the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.), with applicable federal law or with any applicable requirement for the Commonwealth to obtain or maintain federal delegation or approval of any regulatory program.

History.

1997, cc. 645, 667.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Code Commission, the number in the 1997 act having been

10.1-1186.1

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 inserted “or the Department” throughout; in subsection A in the introductory language, inserted “or the Director, in his discretion,” “by the Board,” and “by the Department”; in subdivision A 2 and in subsection D, substituted “the Department” for “the Board”; inserted “Department or the” in subdivision A 6 in the first paragraph; inserted “or the Department’s” in subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “considered by the Department” for “considered by a Board” and inserted “by a Board in”; inserted “and the Department” in subsection D; in subsection E in the first paragraph, inserted “the Department or” and “respectively”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For an article, “Administrative Procedure,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 907 (1997).

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

§ 10.1-1186.3.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Additional powers of Boards and the Department; mediation; alternative dispute resolution.

The State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, and the Virginia Waste Management Board, in their discretion, or the Director, in his discretion, may employ mediation as defined in §

8.01-581.21

, or a dispute resolution proceeding as defined in §

8.01-576.4

, in appropriate cases to resolve underlying issues, reach a consensus, or compromise on contested issues. An “appropriate case” means any process related to the development of a regulation by the Board or the issuance of a permit by the Department in which it is apparent that there are significant issues of disagreement among interested persons and for which the Board or the Department finds that the use of a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding is in the public interest. The Boards or the Department shall consider not using a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding if:

A definitive or authoritative resolution of the matter is required for precedential value, and such a proceeding is not likely to be accepted generally as an authoritative precedent;

The matter involves or may bear upon significant questions of state policy that require additional procedures before a final resolution may be made, and such a proceeding would not likely serve to develop a recommended policy for the Department;

Maintaining established policies is of special importance, so that variations among individual decisions are not increased and such a proceeding would not likely reach consistent results among individual decisions;

The matter significantly affects persons or organizations who are not parties to the proceeding;

A full public record of the proceeding is important, and a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding cannot provide such a record; and

The Board or the Department must maintain continuing jurisdiction over the matter with the authority to alter the disposition of the matter in light of changed circumstances, and a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding would interfere with the Department or the Board’s fulfilling that requirement.

Mediation and alternative dispute resolution as authorized by this section are voluntary procedures which supplement rather than limit other dispute resolution techniques available to the Boards or the Department. Mediation or a dispute resolution proceeding may be employed in the issuance of a permit only with the consent and participation of the permit applicant and shall be terminated at the request of the permit applicant.

The decision to employ mediation or a dispute resolution proceeding is in a Board’s or the Department’s sole discretion and is not subject to judicial review.

The outcome of any mediation or dispute resolution proceeding shall not be binding upon a Board or the Department, but may be considered by the Department in issuing a permit or by a Board in promulgating a regulation.

Each Board and the Department shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Process Act, for the implementation of this section. Such rules and regulations shall include (i) standards and procedures for the conduct of mediation and dispute resolution, including an opportunity for interested persons identified by the Department to participate in the proceeding; (ii) the appointment and function of a neutral, as defined in §

8.01-576.4

, to encourage and assist parties to voluntarily compromise or settle contested issues; and (iii) procedures to protect the confidentiality of papers, work product or other materials.

The provisions of §

8.01-576.10

concerning the confidentiality of a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding shall govern all such proceedings held pursuant to this section except where the Department or a Board uses or relies on information obtained in the course of such proceeding in issuing a permit or promulgating a regulation, respectively.

Nothing in this section shall create or alter any right, action or cause of action, or be interpreted or applied in a manner inconsistent with the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.), with applicable federal law or with any applicable requirement for the Commonwealth to obtain or maintain federal delegation or approval of any regulatory program.

History.

1997, cc. 645, 667; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1186.4.
Enforcement powers; federal court.

In addition to the authority of the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board and the Director to bring actions in the courts of the Commonwealth to enforce any law, regulation, case decision or condition of a permit or certification, the Attorney General is hereby authorized on behalf of such boards or the Director to seek to intervene pursuant to Rule 24 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure in any action then pending in a federal court in order to resolve a dispute already being litigated in that court by the United States through the Environmental Protection Agency.

History.

2001, cc. 166, 174.

Law Review.

For article, “Environmental Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 601 (2001).

§ 10.1-1186.5.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 738, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective until submission of the final report.” The final report was submitted November 15, 2005. See House Document 103 (2005).

Former §

10.1-1186.5

, pertaining to creation of the Low Impact Development Assessment Task Force, was enacted by Acts 2003, c. 738, and amended by Acts 2005, c. 41.

§ 10.1-1186.6.
Carbon market participation; submerged aquatic vegetation.

The Department may participate in any carbon market for which submerged aquatic vegetation restoration qualifies as an activity that generates carbon offset credits. Any revenue resulting from the sale of such credits shall be used to implement additional submerged aquatic vegetation monitoring and research or to cover any administrative costs of participation in the credit market. The Department may enter into agreements necessary to effect such participation, including with private entities for assistance with registration and sale of offset credits. The Department shall hold exclusive title to such credits until sold.

History.

2020, c. 810.

§ 10.1-1187.
Provision of the Code continued.

The conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, powers and duties of any section, article, or chapter of the Code in effect on March 31, 1993, relating to agencies consolidated in this chapter shall apply to the Department of Environmental Quality until superseded by new legislation.

History.

1992, c. 887.